Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1166.
do enact as follows:SB1166,14Section 1. 66.0511 (1) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 66.0511 (1) (ag).SB1166,25Section 2. 66.0511 (1) (ac) of the statutes is created to read:SB1166,1,7666.0511 (1) (ac) “Autonomous device” means a device that is capable of 7operating without active control by a human operator.SB1166,38Section 3. 66.0511 (1) (aj) of the statutes is created to read:SB1166,2,1166.0511 (1) (aj) “Dangerous weapon” has the meaning given in s. 939.22 (10).SB1166,42Section 4. 66.0511 (5) of the statutes is created to read:SB1166,2,4366.0511 (5) Use of autonomous devices. A law enforcement agency may 4not use an autonomous device that is equipped with a dangerous weapon.SB1166,2,55